Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.341

Information technology portfolios.

Information technology portfolios shall reflect (1) links among an agency's objectives, business plan, and technology; (2) analysis of the effect of an agency's proposed new technology investments on its existing infrastructure and business functions; and (3) analysis of the effect of proposed information technology investments on the state's information technology infrastructure.

[ 1999 c 80 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.41A.110, 43.105.172.]